Arkansas, session 2025, SB406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-15-403, concerning instruments affecting
title to property, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(f)(1)(A)(i) A deed to real estate presented to a recorder for
recording either in person or by mail shall not be received for record or
filing by the recorder unless the grantor named in the deed to real estate or
an individual signing the deed on behalf of the grantor named in the deed to
real estate appears in person at the office of the recorder and presents a
valid photo identification card or driver's license.
(ii) If a deed to real estate is presented to a
recorder for recording by mail, the grantor named in the deed to the real
estate shall include a photocopy of his or her valid photo identification or
driver's license with the deed to real estate submitted by mail.
(B) As used in subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section,
"valid photo identification card or driver's license" means a photo
*TNL285*
04-07-2025 15:07:34 TNL285

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S3/19/25 S4/7/25 SB406
identification card or driver's license issued by a state agency or a United
States Government agency.
(C) A recorder shall record a copy of all valid photo
identification cards or driver's licenses presented under subdivision
(f)(1)(A) of this section by attaching the photocopies to the deed to real
estate being recorded in accordance with the requirements under § 21-6-306.
(2) Subdivision (f)(1) of this section does not apply to a deed
to real estate that is presented to the recorder by:
(A) An attorney;
(B) A real estate broker or a real estate agent;
(C) A representative of a bank, mortgage company, or
lending institution;
(D) A title insurance agent, title insurance agency, or
person affiliated with a title insurance agency;
(E) The Commissioner of State Lands;
(F) An individual representing the state or a political
subdivision of the state; or
(G) The state, a municipality within the state, a county
within the state, or a political subdivision of the state.
(3) An unredacted copy of a valid photo identification card or
driver's license shall be filed by the recorder under seal.

/s/A. Clark













04-07-2025 15:07:34 TNL285